Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.510

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Authorized.

Any city or town may prepare or cause to be prepared a codification of its ordinances.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.510. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 2.]